DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROLSUSPENSION &

SKYHOOK TEMS

DI-233

DI3GJ-03

DTC

C1719/19 Fluid Temperature Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This circuit is sending the data to detect the fluid temperature of the pump and to judge the abnormality of
the fluid by the ECU.

or less or 4.8 V or more) for every 0.01 sec. and that condition
continued for 0.5 sec. and had been consisted 10 times.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
When detecting the abnormal signal from the fluid temp. )
. ) ) ¢ Fluidtemperature sensor
sensor (Fluid temp. sensor terminal voltage of ECU is 0.1 V ) o
C1719/19 « Fluid temperature sensor circuit

» Suspension control ECU
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DI-234 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVE HEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

Start the inspection from step 1 in case of using the hand-held tester and start from step 2 in case of not
using the hand-held tester.

1 Check output value of fluid temperature sensor.

PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.
(c) Select the DATALIST mode on the hand-held tester.
CHECK:
Check the temperature value of the fluid temperature sensor displayed on the hand-held tester.
OK:
Same as actual fluid temperature

@

2 | Check fluid temperature sensor.

OK> Clear the DTC (See page DI-208).

PREPARATION:

Disconnect the fluid temperature sensor connector.

CHECK:

2 Gyl Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of fluid tempera-
g ture sensor connector.
1 OK:
S\ Resistance:2.45 + 0.45k Q at20 °C(68 °F)
Q)—
F05728

NG> Replace fluid temperature sensor.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVE HEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION & DI-235
SKYHOOK TEMS

3 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between fluid temper-
ature sensor and suspension control ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Clear the DTC (See page DI-208).
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